Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.230

Monthly payments.

A pension, annuity, or a retirement allowance granted under the provisions of this chapter, unless otherwise specified herein, shall be payable in monthly installments, and each installment shall cover for the current calendar month.

[ 1947 c 71 s 23; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9592-152.]